apertium-kjh.kjh.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

Multichar_Symbols

!! parts of speech
%<n%>             ! Имя существительное
%<np%>            !
%<prn%>           !
%<det%>           !
%<num%>           !
%<adj%>           !
%<v%>             !

!! numbers
%<sg%>            !
%<pl%>            !

!! cases
%<nom%>           ! Именительный падеж
%<acc%>           ! Винительный падеж
%<gen%>           ! 
%<dat%>           ! 
%<loc%>           ! 
%<abl%>           ! 
%<all%>           ! 
%<ins%>           ! 
%<prl%>           ! 
%<cir%>           ! 

!! possessives
%<px1sg%>         !
%<px2sg%>         !
%<px3sp%>         !
%<px1pl%>         !
%<px2pl%>         !

!! persons
%<p1%>            !
%<p2%>            !
%<p3%>            !

!! types of verbs
%<iv%>            !
%<tv%>            !

!! tenses
%<past%>          !
%<pres%>          !
%<fut%>           !

!! non-finite verb types
%<gna%>           !
%<gna_cnd%>       !

%<attr%>          !
%<subst%>         !

!! types of pronouns
%<pers%>          !
%<dem%>           !
%<ref%>           !

!! types of np
%<top%>           !
%<ant%>           !
%<cog%>           !
%<pat%>           !

%<m%>             !
%<mf%>             !
%<f%>             !


%<sent%>          ! 
%<guio%>          ! 
%<cm%>            ! 

%{L%}             ! 
%{N%}             ! 
%{G%}             ! 
%{D%}             !
%{S%}             ! 
%{J%}             ! 

%{A%}             ! 
%{I%}             ! 

%{y%}             !
%{s%}             !
%{n%}             !

%{☭%}             !

%>                ! 
%                 ! 
%-                !
%+                !

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Pronouns ; 
Determiners ; 
Numerals ;
Nouns ; 
ProperNouns ;
Adjectives ; 
Verbs ; 

Punctuation ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CLITICS-INCL-COP 

# ; 

LEXICON CLITICS-NO-COP 

# ; 

LEXICON CASES-COMMON

%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ins%>:%>н%{A%}ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON CASES

CASES-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}ң CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<all%>:%>%{S%}%{A%}р CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<prl%>:%>%{J%}%{A%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<cir%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}ң%{A%}р CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON ATTR-SUBST

%<attr%>: # ;
%<subst%>: CASES ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;

LEXICON GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC

%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} ATTR-SUBST ;

LEXICON CASES-ETC

CASES ;
GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC ;

LEXICON POSSESSIVES

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м CASES-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CASES-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}с CASES-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{A%}р CASES-ETC ;

LEXICON PLURAL

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSIVES ;
!%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION

PLURAL ;
CASES-ETC ;
POSSESSIVES ;
!ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON N1

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON N5

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>:%{☭%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NP-COMMON

FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NP-TOP 

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M 

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-COG-M

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
!%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OBIN-FEM

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:а NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<pl%>:а%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OB

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./
! Also, even the ев ones are normally pronounced
!    (and take harmony) as if they end in йыф/йып

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;                       ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{☭%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR

!%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{а%}%{с%} NP-COMMON ;
!%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{а%}%{с%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;


LEXICON NP-PAT-VICH

! For patronyms ending with -вич
! Their feminine equivalets end with -вна /I.S./

%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>:вич%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;

%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>:вна NP-COMMON ;


LEXICON NUM 

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON A1 

%<adj%>: # ; 

LEXICON A4

%<adj%>: # ; 

LEXICON A9 

%<adj%>: # ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-FUT

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{B%}%{I%}н # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}ң # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{B%}%{I%}с # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{S%}%{A%}р # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р # ;

LEXICON V-FINITE

%<past%>:%{G%}%{A%}н # ;
%<pres%>:%{J%}%{A%} # ;

%<fut%>:%{A%}р V-PERS-FUT ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%{B%}%{A%}с V-PERS-FUT ;

LEXICON V-NONFINITE

%<gna%>:%{I%}п # ;
%<gna_cnd%>:%{S%}%{A%} # ;


LEXICON V-COMMON

V-FINITE ;
V-NONFINITE ;

LEXICON V-IV 

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON ; 

LEXICON V-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ; 

LEXICON PRON-REF-PERS

!FIXME: more person endings
!FIXME: what comes after these?
%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м # ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң # ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} # ;

LEXICON PRON-REF

%<prn%>%<ref%>: PRON-REF-PERS ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-12SG 

%<nom%>:ин # ; 
%<gen%>:инің # ; 
%<dat%>:ағаа # ; 
%<acc%>:ині # ; 
%<loc%>:инде # ; 
%<abl%>:инeң # ; 
%<all%>:инзер # ; 
%<ins%>:иннең # ; 

LEXICON PRON-PERS-MIN

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>: PRON-PERS-12SG ; 

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SIN

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: PRON-PERS-12SG ; 

LEXICON PRON-PERS-OL 

ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ол # ; 
ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:аның # ; 
ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:аа # ; 
ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:аны # ; 
ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:анда # ; 
ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:анаң # ; 
ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<all%>:аныңзар # ; 
ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:аннаң # ; 

LEXICON PRON-DEM-PU 

пу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:пу # ; 
пу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:мының # ; 
пу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:пуға # ; 
пу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:мыны # ; 
пу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:мында # ; 
пу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:мыннаң # ; 
пу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<all%>:пузар # ; 
пу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<all%>:мындар # ;  ! Dir/LR
пу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:мынынаң # ; 

LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL

! FIXME: could just direct to CASES?
%<nom%>: # ;
%<gen%>:%{N%}%{I%}ң # ; 
%<dat%>:%{G%}%{A%} # ; 
%<acc%>:%{N%}%{I%} # ; 
%<loc%>:%{D%}%{A%} # ; 
%<abl%>:%{D%}%{A%}ң # ; 
%<all%>:%{S%}%{A%}р # ; 
%<ins%>:%{N%}%{A%}ң # ; 

LEXICON PRON-PERS-PIS

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>: PRON-PERS-PL ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SIRER

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>: PRON-PERS-PL ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-OLAR

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>: PRON-PERS-PL ;

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Pronouns 

мин:м PRON-PERS-MIN ; ! "я"
син:с PRON-PERS-SIN ; ! "ты"
PRON-PERS-OL ; ! "он, она, оно"

піс:піс PRON-PERS-PIS ;
сірер:сірер PRON-PERS-SIRER ;
олар:олар PRON-PERS-OLAR ;

PRON-DEM-PU ; ! "это"

пос:пос PRON-REF ; ! "self"


LEXICON Determiners 

пу:пу DET-DEM ; ! "этот, эта, это"

LEXICON Numerals 

пір:пір NUM ; ! "один"
ікі:ікі NUM ; ! "два"
ӱс:ӱс NUM ; ! "три"
тӧрт:тӧрт NUM ; ! "четыре"
піс:піс NUM ; ! "пять"
алды:алды NUM ; ! "шесть"

сигіс:сигіс NUM ; ! "восем"
тоғыс:тоғыс NUM ; ! "девет"
он:он NUM ; ! ""

миллион:миллион NUM ; ! ""
миллиард:миллиард NUM ; ! ""

LEXICON Nouns 
алтын:алтын N1 ; ! "золото"
иртен:иртен N1 ; ! "утро"
кальций:кальций N1 ; ! "кальций"
кӧзенек:кӧзенек N1 ; ! "окно"
малты:малты N1 ; ! "топор"
олтырых:олтырых N1 ; ! "остров"
палты:палты N1 ; ! "топор"
пуғдай:пуғдай N1 ; ! "пшеница"
сазын:сазын N1 ; ! "бумага"
сӧс:сӧс N1 ; ! "слово"
тӧң:тӧң N1 ; ! ""
хорыхханы:хорыхханы N1 ; ! "страх"
чахайах:чахайах N1 ; ! "цветок"
алары:алары N1 ; ! ""
ирепчі:ирепчі N1 ; ! ""
кнес:кнес N1 ; ! ""
кӱрген:кӱрген N1 ; ! ""
олғанах:олғанах N1 ; ! ""
палғалыс:палғалыс N1 ; ! ""
полызығ:полызығ N1 ; ! ""
салковай:салковай N1 ; ! ""
сый:сый N1 ; ! ""
тоғынӌы:тоғынӌы N1 ; ! ""
ӱгренӌі:ӱгренӌі N1 ; ! ""
хаалағ:хаалағ N1 ; ! ""
хорадығ:хорадығ N1 ; ! ""
чазанӌых:чазанӌых N1 ; ! ""
читіген:читіген N1 ; ! ""
интернат:интернат N5 ; ! "интернат"
администратор:администратор N5 ; ! ""
ансамбль:ансамбль N5 ; ! ""
армия:армия N5 ; ! ""
бухгалтер:бухгалтер N5 ; ! ""
город:город N5 ; ! ""
диспансер:диспансер N5 ; ! ""
институт:институт N5 ; ! ""
ипподром:ипподром N5 ; ! ""
карта:карта N5 ; ! ""
класс:класс N5 ; ! ""
колхоз:колхоз N5 ; ! ""
композитор:композитор N5 ; ! ""
культура:культура N5 ; ! ""
литература:литература N5 ; ! ""
машина:машина N5 ; ! ""
менеджер:менеджер N5 ; ! ""
музей:музей N5 ; ! ""
область:область N5 ; ! ""
организатор:организатор N5 ; ! ""
полиция:полиция N5 ; ! ""
производитель:производитель N5 ; ! ""
репетиция:репетиция N5 ; ! ""
совет:совет N5 ; ! ""
сцена:сцена N5 ; ! ""
тюркология:тюркология N5 ; ! ""
юрист:юрист N5 ; ! ""
администрация:администрация N1 ; ! ""
октябрь:октябрь N5 ; ! ""
LEXICON ProperNouns 
Россия:Россия NP-TOP ; ! "Россия"
Казахстан:Казахстан NP-TOP ; ! "Казахстан"
Хакасия:Хакасия NP-TOP ; ! "Хакасия"
Турция:Турция NP-TOP ; ! ""
Шория:Шория NP-TOP ; ! ""
Швейцария:Швейцария NP-TOP ; ! ""
Бишкек:Бишкек NP-TOP ; ! "Бишкек"
Новосибирск:Новосибирск NP-TOP ; ! "Новосибирск"
Томск:Томск NP-TOP ; ! "Томск"
Алтай:Алтай NP-TOP ; ! ""
Азербайджан:Азербайджан NP-TOP ; ! ""
Сыбыр:Сыбыр NP-TOP ; ! ""
Москва:Москва NP-TOP ; ! ""
Иркутск:Иркутск NP-TOP ; ! ""
Саяногорск:Саяногорск NP-TOP ; ! ""
Леонид:Леонид NP-ANT-M ; ! "Леонид"
Руслан:Руслан NP-ANT-M ; ! "Руслан"
Николай:Николай NP-ANT-M ; ! "Николай"
Александр:Александр NP-ANT-M ; ! "Александр"
Владимир:Владимир NP-ANT-M ; ! "Владимир"
Василий:Василий NP-ANT-M ; ! "Василий"
Сергей:Сергей NP-ANT-M ; ! "Сергей"
Виктор:Виктор NP-ANT-M ; ! "Виктор"
Алексей:Алексей NP-ANT-M ; ! "Алексей"
Юрий:Юрий NP-ANT-M ; ! "Юрий"
Иван:Иван NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Игорь:Игорь NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Дмитрий:Дмитрий NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Лариса:Лариса NP-ANT-F ; ! "Лариса"
Юлия:Юлия NP-ANT-F ; ! "Юлия"
Евгения:Евгения NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Ирина:Ирина NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Анастасия:Анастасия NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Татьяна:Татьяна NP-ANT-F ; ! "Татьяна"
Наталья:Наталья NP-ANT-F ; ! "Наталья"
Екатерина:Екатерина NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Мария:Мария NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Лилия:Лилия NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Соломенников:Соломенников NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Побызаков:Побызаков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Давлетов:Давлетов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
хакасов:хакасов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Трапезников:Трапезников NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Салихов:Салихов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Миндибеков:Миндибеков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Котожеков:Котожеков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Килижеков:Килижеков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Карпов:Карпов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Канзычаков:Канзычаков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Боргояков:Боргояков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Асочаков:Асочаков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Абумов:Абумов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Танбаев:Танбаев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Мамышев:Мамышев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Турганбаев:Турганбаев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Куйбышев:Куйбышев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Еркибеев:Еркибеев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Бутанаев:Бутанаев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Казагашев:Казагашев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Крюков:Крюков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Мохов:Мохов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Саможиков:Саможиков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Серебряков:Серебряков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Субраков:Субраков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Толмашов:Толмашов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Червяков:Червяков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Александрович:Александро NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Анатольевич:Анатолье NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Васильевич:Василье NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Вениаминович:Вениамино NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Владимирович:Владимиро NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Гаврилович:Гаврило NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Геннадьевич:Геннадье NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Григорьевич:Григорье NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Гурьевич:Гурье NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Дмитриевич:Дмитрие NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Иванович:Ивано NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Максимович:Максимо NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Михайлович:Михайло NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Николаевич:Николае NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Петрович:Петро NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Романович:Романо NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Степанович:Степано NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Тамаровский:Тамаровский NP-COG-M ; ! ""
